Hawaii, session 2025, GM1321.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the State's mental
health laws provide the State with a variety of methods to help
and support individuals suffering from mental illness or
substance abuse. As the number of individuals in need of help
increases, so has the need to enhance these laws in a manner
that demystifies the complexities of existing procedures,
clarifies the circumstances under which action can be taken, and
bolsters available tools to best serve these individuals. Legal
mechanisms, such as emergency procedures, involuntary
hospitalization, assisted community treatment, and authorization
for the administration of treatment, enable the State and mental
health providers to provide compassionate assistance to
individuals suffering from mental illness or substance abuse
when they need it the most.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to clarify, update,
and revise Hawaii's mental health laws by:
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA~l.docx

■lillMlilllinNMMHIIIIi

Page 2
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(1) Requiring the department of health to submit annual
reports to the legislature on emergency
transportations and assisted community treatment
petitions and orders, based on information provided by
service providers and the department of the attorney
general;
(2) Clarifying emergency transportation, examination, and
hospitalization procedures for individuals who may be
mentally ill or suffering from substance abuse and are
imminently dangerous to self or others;
(3) Requiring treatment providers to provide relevant
treatment information to the department of the
attorney general, upon the department's request, for
purposes of preparing a petition for assisted
community treatment;
(4) Amending the procedures for involuntary
hospitalizations and assisted community treatment
petitions;
(5) Clarifying the circumstances under which a subject of
an order for assisted community treatment can be
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx

Page 3
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
administered medication over the subject's objection;
and
(6) Allowing a single psychiatrist, rather than a panel of
three, to provide administrative authorization for
medical treatment over the objection of a patient who
is in the custody of the director of health and in a
psychiatric facility.
SECTION 2. Chapter 334, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"§334-A Annual report; emergency transportations; assisted
community treatment. Each provider of services involved in an
emergency transportation initiated by a law enforcement officer,
couT;t order^or^iea ltli ca^re proyider2 assisted communi;^
treatment petition; or assisted community treatment order
pursuant to part IV or VIII, and the department of the attorney
general, shall provide the necessary data to the department to
complete the report under this section. Based on this data, the
department shall submit an annual report to the legislature no
later than thirty days prior to the convening of each regular
session.
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx
■iimiHiHiiiiiMnwa

Page 4
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
The report shall include, at a minimum, an evaluation of
the effectiveness of the strategies employed by each provider
operating pursuant to parts IV and VIII in reducing
hospitalization of persons subject to emergency transportation
or assisted community treatment and in reducing involvement with
local law enforcement by persons subject to assisted community
treatment orders. The evaluation and report shall also include
any other measures identified by the department regarding
individuals subject to assisted community treatment petitions
and orders and all of the following, based on information that
is available;
(1) The number of individuals brought to each of the
facilities operated by service providers through
emergency transportation, and the number of those
individuals transported due to enforcement of an order
for assisted community treatment;
(2) The number of individuals involuntarily hospitalized
through emergency transportation and emergency
examination;
(3) The number of individuals subject to assisted
community treatment orders;
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx
■MMiillMINIIH

Page 5
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(4) The petitioner's relationship to the individual
subject to the assisted community treatment petition;
The number of individuals under assisted community
treatment orders who become involved with the criminal
justice system by way of arrests, convictions,
probation, incarceration, or other relevant data;
(6) The need for hospitalization and related length of
stay for individuals after they become subject to an
assisted community treatment order;
(7) Adherence to prescribed treatment by individuals
subject to an assisted community treatment order; and
(8) Other indicators of successful engagement, if any, by
individuals subject to an assisted community treatment
order.”
SECTION 3. Chapter 334, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By adding a new subpart to part IV to be designated as
subpart A and to read:
"A. Emergency Procedures
§334-B Emergency procedures. The emergency procedures in
this subpart shall consist of emergency transportation.
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx

MiiiimiiiMiiiin

Page 6
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
emergency examination, and emergency hospitalization for
individuals who may be mentally ill or suffering from substance
abuse and imminently dangerous to self or others.
§334-C Emergency transportation initiated by a law
enforcement officer. (a) When a law enforcement officer has a
reasonable suspicion that an individual is imminently dangerous
to self or others and needs to be detained for emergency
examination, the law enforcement officer shall contact a mental
health emergency worker; provided that the law enforcement
officer may temporarily detain the individual if the law
enforcement officer:
(1) Is unable to reach a mental health emergency worker
telephonically after three attempts;
(2) Has reason to believe that the situation requires
immediate intervention to prevent harm to the
individual or others;
(3) Contacts a mental health emergency worker at the
earliest time possible; and
(4) Documents the reasons why the situation necessitated
that the individual be detained.
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx

■liiiiiiiiMiinnHiiiii

Page 7
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
If the mental health emergency worker determines that the
individual is mentally ill or suffering from substance abuse and
is imminently dangerous to self or others, the law enforcement
officer shall detain the individual for transportation to a
facility for an emergency examination.
(b) When a crisis intervention officer has probable cause
to believe that an individual is mentally ill or suffering from
substance abuse and is imminently dangerous to self or others,
the crisis intervention officer shall detain the individual for
transportation to a facility for an emergency examination. The
crisis intervention officer shall contact a mental health
emergency worker to determine the type of facility where the
individual shall be transported.
(c) Any individual detained under this section shall be
transported directly to a psychiatric facility or other facility
designated by the director, as determined by a mental health
emergency worker; provided that if a medical emergency occurs
during transport, the individual shall be transported to the
nearest emergency department. A law enforcement officer shall
make an application for the emergency examination of the
individual. The application shall state in detail the
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx
iiMwinnMiiiiniiHm

Page 8 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
circumstances under which and reasons why the individual was
taken into custody. The application shall be transmitted with
the individual to the psychiatric facility or other facility
designated by the director and be made a part of the
individual's clinical record.
(d) For the purposes of this section, "crisis intervention
officer" has the same meaning as defined in section 353C-1.
§334-D Emergency transportation initiated by a court
order. (a) Upon written or oral application of any licensed
physician, advanced practice registered nurse, psychologist,
attorney, member of the clergy, health or social service
professional, or any state or county employee in the course of
employment, a judge may issue a written or oral ex parte order:
(1) Stating that there is probable cause that the
individual is:
(A) Mentally ill or suffering from substance abuse;
and
(B) Imminently dangerous to self or others;
(2) Stating the findings upon which the conclusion is
based; and
2025-2876 SB1322 GDI SMA-l.docx 8

Page 9
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(3) Directing that a law enforcement officer take the
individual into custody and transport the individual
directly to a psychiatric facility or other facility
designated by the director for an emergency
S examination.
The person who made the application shall notify a mental
health emergency worker of the written or oral ex parte order
and, when possible, shall coordinate the transport of the
individual with the emergency worker.
(b) If an application under subsection (a) was made
orally, the person who made the application shall reduce the
application to writing and submit it to the judge who issued the
ex parte order by noon of the next court day after the order was
issued. The written application shall be made under penalty of
law but need not be sworn to before a notary public. If the
judge issued an ex parte order orally, the judge shall reduce
the oral order to writing by the close of the next court day
after the order was issued. The written ex parte order shall be
transmitted with the individual to the psychiatric facility or
other facility designated by the director and be made a part of
the individual's clinical record.
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx

S.B. NO.
CD. 1
§334-E Emergency transportation Initiated by a health care
provider. (a) Any licensed physician, advanced practice
registered nurse, physician assistant, licensed clinical social
worker, or psychologist who has examined an individual and
determines that the individual is mentally ill or suffering from
substance abuse and is imminently dangerous to self or others
may direct a law enforcement officer to detain and transport the
individual by ambulance or other suitable means to a psychiatric
facility or other facility designated by the director for an
emergency examination, and may administer treatment, within the
examining health care provider's scope of practice, as necessary
for the individual's safe transportation. The examining health
care provider shall provide a written statement of circumstances
and reasons necessitating the emergency examination. The
written statement shall be transmitted with the individual to
the psychiatric facility or other facility designated by the
director and be made a part of the individual's clinical record.
(b) Any individual who is subject to an order for assisted
community treatment and fails to comply with the order for
assisted community treatment, despite reasonable efforts made by
a designated assisted community treatment provider, as defined
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 1

Page 11 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
in section 334-122, to solicit compliance, may be transported to
a psychiatric facility or other facility designated by the
director for an emergency examination if it is in the clinical
judgment of a licensed physician, advanced practice registered
nurse, physician assistant, licensed clinical social worker, or
psychologist that the individual may be in need of emergency
hospitalization pursuant to section 334-G. At the direction of
the examining health care provider, a law enforcement officer
may detain and transport the individual by ambulance or other
suitable means to a psychiatric facility or other facility
designated by the director. The examining health care provider
shall provide a written statement of circumstances and reasons
explaining why the individual may be in need of emergency
hospitalization. The written statement shall be transmitted
with the individual to the psychiatric facility or other
facility designated by the director and be made a part of the
individual's clinical record.
(c) Those performing the emergency transport shall
coordinate the transport of the individual with the mental
health emergency worker.
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx r

Page 12 S.B. NO. 1322
S.D.2
H.D. 2
CD. 1
(d) The examining health care provider shall also provide
a copy of the written statement required under this section to
the department within five business days.
§334-F Emergency examination. (a) A licensed physician,
medical resident under the supervision of a licensed physician,
physician assistant, psychologist, or advanced practice
registered nurse may conduct an initial examination and
screening of a patient transported under section 334-C, 334-D,
or 334-E to determine whether the criteria for involuntary
hospitalization listed in section 334.60.2 persists and
administer treatment as indicated by good medical practice;
provided that if after the examination, screening, and
treatment, the licensed physician, medical resident under the
supervision of a licensed physician, physician assistant,
psychologist, or advanced practice registered nurse determines
that the involuntary hospitalization criteria persists, then the
patient shall be further examined by a qualified psychiatric
examiner to diagnose the presence or absence of a mental illness
or substance use disorder, further assess the risk that the
patient may be dangerous to self or others, and assess whether
or not the patient continues to meet the criteria for
2025-2876 SB1322 GDI SMA-l.docx 12

Page 13
S.B. NO.
CD. 1
involuntary hospitalization as provided in section 334-60.2. If
no initial examination and screening of the patient is
conducted, a qualified psychiatric examiner shall conduct an
emergency examination of a patient transported under section
334-C, 334-D, or 334-E without unnecessary delay and provide the
patient with treatment as indicated by good medical practice;
provided that the emergency examination shall include a
determination of whether the patient meets the criteria for
involuntary hospitalization as provided in section 334-60.2.
(b) If, following an emergency examination of a patient
under subsection (a), a qualified psychiatric examiner
determines that the criteria for involuntary hospitalization do
not exist, the patient shall be discharged expeditiously;
provided that if the patient is not under an order for assisted
IS community treatment, a qualified psychiatric examiner shall
conduct an examination pursuant to section 334-121.5 before the
discharge. A patient under criminal charges shall be returned
to the custody of a law enforcement officer.
§334-G Emergency hospitalization. (a) If, following an
emergency examination pursuant to section 334-F(a), a qualified
psychiatric examiner determines that the criteria for
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 13

Page 14 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
involuntary hospitalization exist, the patient shall be
hospitalized on an emergency basis or transferred to another
psychiatric facility or other facility designated by the
director for emergency hospitalization.
(b) The patient admitted under subsection (a) shall be
released within seventy-two hours of the patient's admission to
a psychiatric facility or other facility designated by the
director, unless:
(1) The patient voluntarily agrees to further
hospitalization; or
(2) A proceeding for court-ordered evaluation or
hospitalization is initiated as provided in section
334-60.3.
If the seventy-two-hour time period expires on a Saturday,
Sunday, or holiday, the time for initiation shall be extended to
the close of the next court day. Upon initiation of the
proceeding, the facility may detain the patient until further
order of the court.
(c) If at any time during the period of emergency
hospitalization a qualified psychiatric examiner determines that
a patient no longer meets the criteria for emergency
2025-2876 SB1322 GDI SMA-l.docx 14

Page 15
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
hospitalization, the patient shall be discharged expeditiously;
provided that if the patient is not under an order for assisted
community treatment, a qualified psychiatric examiner shall
conduct an examination pursuant to section 334-121.5 before the
discharge. A patient under criminal charges shall be returned
to the custody of a law enforcement officer.
(d) The patient shall have the right, immediately upon
emergency hospitalization, to telephone an attorney and the
patient's surrogate, guardian, family member including a
reciprocal beneficiary, or adult friend. The patient shall be
allowed to confer with an attorney in private.
§334-H Notice of emergency transportation, examination,
and hospitalization. Notice of an individual's emergency
transportation, examination, and hospitalization under this
IS subpart may be given to at least one of the following persons in
the following order of priority: the individual's spouse or
reciprocal beneficiary, legal parents, adult children,
surrogate, legal guardian, or if none can be found, the closest
adult relative, as long as the individual:
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx


Page 16 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(1) Has capacity to make health care decisions and
consents that notice may be given to at least one of
the persons listed in this section;
(2) Is given the opportunity to object and does not
object, or the health care provider can reasonably
infer from the circumstances based on the exercise of
professional judgment that the individual does not
object; or
(3) Is incapacitated or an emergency circumstance exists,
and the health care provider determines, based on the
exercise of professional judgment, that giving
notification is in the best interest of the
individual.
The staff of the facility shall make reasonable efforts to
ensure that the patient's family, including a reciprocal
beneficiary, is notified of the emergency hospitalization,
unless the patient is an adult and waives notification."
2. By designating section 334-60.1 as subpart B and
inserting a title before section 334-60.1 to read:
"B. Voluntary Admission"
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 16

Page 17
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
3. By designating sections 334-60.2 through 334-60.7 as
subpart C and inserting a title before section 334-60.2 to read:
"C. Involuntary Hospitalization"
4. By designating sections 334-61 and 334-62 as subpart D
and inserting a title before section 334-61 to read:
"D. General Provisions"
SECTION 4. Chapter 334, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part VIII to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"§334-I Records and disclosure of information. (a) A
treatment provider who provided or is providing medical,
psychiatric, therapeutic, or social services treatment to an
individual shall provide relevant treatment information, if
available, to the department of the attorney general upon the
department's request for the purpose of preparing a petition for
assisted community treatment. The treatment information may
include a certificate issued pursuant to section 334-123(c), a
treatment plan prepared pursuant to section 334-126 (g), records
related to actions or proceedings pursuant to part IV, records
relating to the individual's treatment history, and other
records deemed relevant by the individual's treatment provider.
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx I’

Page 18
S.B. NO.
CD. 1
(b) The petitioner of an assisted conununity treatment
order, department of the attorney general, and family court
shall disclose an assisted community treatment order to state
and county law enforcement agencies, an assisted community
treatment provider, or any other entity necessary to carry out
the terms of the assisted community treatment order.”
SECTION 5. Section 334-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By adding two new definitions to be appropriately
inserted and to read:
'"'Qualified psychiatric examiner" means a licensed
psychiatrist or advanced practice registered nurse with
prescriptive authority who holds an accredited national
certification in an advanced practice registered nurse
psychiatric specialization.
"Surrogate" means a person appointed under:
(1) A power of attorney for health care to make a health
care decision for the individual who made the
appointment; or
(2) Law or court order to make health care decisions for
an individual."
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 18

Page 19
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
2. By amending the definition of "patient" to read:
""Patient" means [a poraon] an individual under
observation, care, or treatment at a psychiatric facility[f] or
other facility designated by the director."
3. By amending the definition of "treatment" to read:
""Treatment" means the broad range of emergency, out­
patient, intermediate, domiciliary, and inpatient services and
care, including diagnostic evaluation, medical, psychiatric,
psychological, and social service care, vocational
rehabilitation, psychosocial rehabilitation, career counseling,
and other special services [whieh] that may be extended to
[handicapped per-£rono. ] an individual with a disability.''
SECTION 6. Section 334-60.2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§334-60.2 Involuntary hospitalization criteria. [A
poroon] An individual may be committed to a psychiatric facility
for involuntary hospitalization[—] if the court finds:
(1) That the [pee^-en] individual is mentally ill or
suffering from substance abuse;
(2) That the [per-s-eft] individual is imminently dangerous
to self or others; and
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx

IMHIlilMHIlilBI

Page 20 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(3) That the [pcroon] individual is in need of care or
treatment, or both, and there is no suitable
alternative available through existing facilities and
programs [which] that would be less restrictive than
hospitalization."
SECTION 7. Section 334-60.3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§334-60.3 Initiation of proceeding for involuntary
hospitalization. (a) Any person may file a petition alleging
that [a—pers-on located—in the ceunty] an individual meets the
criteria for commitment to a psychiatric facility[—] as provided
in section 334-60.2. The petition shall be filed in the county
where the individual resides and executed subject to [the]
penalties [of perjury] provided by law but need not be sworn to
before a notary public. The [attorney general,—the attorney
gefte^a4As—deputy-?—spee-i-a-l deputy,—or -appointee designated to
present the case] department of the attorney general shall
assist the petitioner [to—state] in stating the substance of the
petition in plain and simple language. The petition may be
accompanied by a certificate of the [licensed physician-,
advanced practice registered nugoc, ] qualified psychiatric
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 20
mniiiMaMiMMH

Page 21
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
examiner or psychologist who has examined the [person-]
individual within two days before [submission of] the
petition[—] is filed, unless the [person] individual whose
commitment is sought has refused to submit to medical or
psychological examination, in which case the fact of refusal
shall be alleged in the petition. The certificate shall set
forth the signs and symptoms relied upon by the [phyoieian,-
advanced practico registered nurso,] qualified psychiatric
examiner or psychologist to determine the [pcrooft] individual is
in need of [care- or] treatment [7—or both-] and whether the
[person] individual is capable of realizing and making a
rational decision with respect to the [person* s] individual's
need for treatment. If the petitioner believes that further
[evaluation] examination is necessary before commitment, the
petitioner may request [sweh] further [evaluation.] examination.
(b) In the event the subject of the petition has been
given an examination, evaluation, or treatment in a psychiatric
facility within five days before submission of the petition, and
hospitalization is recommended by the staff of the facility, the
petition may be accompanied by the administrator's certificate
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx


Page 22
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
in lieu of a [phy-oiciaFt-i-o] qualified psychiatric examiner's or
psychologist's certificate.
(c) The petition shall include the name, address, and
telephone number of at least one of the following persons in the
following order of priority: the subject of the petition's
spouse or reciprocal beneficiary, legal parents, adult children,
surrogate, and legal guardian [7—if ono hao boon appointed]. If
the subject of the petition has no living spouse or reciprocal
beneficiary, legal parent, adult [childron/ ] chjJ^d j surro2ajte^
or legal guardian, or if none can be found, notice shall be
served on at least one of the subject's closest adult relatives,
if any can be found."
SECTION 8. Section 334-60.4, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsections (a) through (c) to read as
follows:
" (a) The court shall set a hearing on the petition and
notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be served in
accordance with, and to those persons specified in, a current
order of commitment. If there is no current order of
commitment, notice of the hearing shall be served personally on
the subject of the petition and served personally or by
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 22

Page 23 SB. NO.
3^2
C.D. 1
certified or registered mail, return receipt requested,
deliverable to the addressee only, on the subject's spouse or
reciprocal beneficiary, legal parents, adult children,
surrogate, and legal guardian [7—if one han boon- appointed] . If
the subject of the petition has no living spouse or reciprocal
beneficiary, legal parent, adult [children,] child, surrogate,
or legal guardian, or if none can be found, notice of the
hearing shall be served on at least one of the subject's closest
adult relatives, if any can be found. Notice of the hearing to
the subject's spouse or reciprocal beneficiary, legal parents,
adult children, or closest adult relative may be waived if the
subject of the petition is an adult and requests that these
persons not be notified. Notice of the hearing shall also be
served on the public defender, attorney for the subject of the
petition, or other court-appointed attorney [a-s-thc case may
be]. If the subject of the petition is a minor, notice of the
hearing shall also be served upon the person who has had the
principal care and custody of the minor during the sixty days
preceding the date of the petition^ if that person can be found
within the State. Notice shall also be given to other persons
as the court may designate.
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx

WMHIIIHnH

Page 24 S.B. NO.
’ H.D. 2
C.D. 1
(b) The notice shall include the following:
(1) The date, time, a^ place of the hearing [-J^. a clear
statement of the purpose of the proceedings and of
possible consequences to the subject [-^] of the
petition; and a statement of the legal standard upon
which commitment is authorized;
(2) A copy of the petition;
(3) A [written notico,] statement, in plain and simple
language, that the subject may waive the hearing by
voluntarily agreeing to hospitalization[—] or^ with
the approval of the court, to some other form of
treatment;
(4) A filled-out form indicating [such] tl^ waiver;
(5) A [written notice,] statement, in plain and simple
language, that the subject or the subject's surrogate,
guardian^ or representative may apply at any time for
a hearing on the issue of the subject's need for
hospitalization, if the subject has previously waived
such a hearing;
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 24

Page 25 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(6) [Nefeiee] A statement that the subject is entitled to
the assistance of an attorney and that the public
defender has been notified of these proceedings; and
(7) [Netiee] A statement that if the subject does not want
to be represented by the public defender, the subject
may contact the subject's own attorney [-;—aftd
-(-8-)- If applicable/—netiree—thatr-fehe-^etirfe-i-efte^?—iftteads—te
adduce evidence to shew that-<he subject of t-hc
potiti-on io an incapacitated-er protected person,—e^-
both7—under article V of chapter 560,—aed—whehhet
appeifttmeat—e^-a—g«a±^iae—ie—seaght—at—^fehe-4^eariftg-r
If appointment of a guardian io to be recommended,—aad
a-H^effHrftee—ie—haewa—at—the—fedme-^ehe—petipieft—ie—ii-ied7-
the identity ef the nominee shall be diocloood].
(c) If the subject of the petition executes and files a
waiver of the hearing, upon acceptance by the court following a
court determination that the [person] subject understands the
[person'o] subject's rights and is competent to waive them, the
court shall order the subject to be committed to a facility that
has agreed to admit the subject as an involuntary patient or, if
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 25
■MtinuinuHniiiiiiHiM

Page 26
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
the subject is at such a facility, that the subject be retained
there."
SECTION 9. Section 334-60.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§334-60.5 Hearing on petition. (a) The court shall
adjourn or continue a hearing for failure to timely notify the
subject of the petition's spouse or reciprocal beneficiary,
legal [paronfes, ] parent, adult child, surrogate,
guardian, or relative, or other person determined by the court
to be entitled to notice, or for failure by the subject to
contact an attorney as provided in section 334-60.4(b)(7) unless
the subject waived notice pursuant to section 334-60.4(a) or the
court determines that the interests of justice require that the
hearing continue without adjournment or continuance.
(b) The time and form of the procedure incident to hearing
the issues in the petition shall be provided by court rule.
Unless the hearing is waived, the judge shall hear the petition
as soon as possible and no later than ten days after the date
the petition is filed unless a reasonable delay is sought for
good cause shown by the subject of the petition, the subject's
2025-2876 SB1322 GDI SMA-l.docx 26

Page 27 S.B. NO.
CD. 1
attorney, or those persons entitled to receive notice of the
hearing under section 334-60.4.
(c) The subject of the petition shall be present at all
hearings unless the subject waives the right to be present, is
unable to attend, or creates conditions that make it impossible
to conduct [the] a hearing in a reasonable manner as determined
by the judge. A waiver is valid only upon acceptance by the
court following a judicial determination that the subject
understands the subject's rights and is competent to waive them,
or is unable to participate. If the subject is unable to
participate, the judge shall appoint a guardian ad litem or a
temporary guardian as provided in article V of chapter 560, to
represent the subject throughout the proceedings.
(d) Hearings may be held at any convenient place within
the circuit. Hearings may be conducted by video conferencing
unless the court determines personal appearance is necessary.
The subject of the petition, any interested party, or the court
on its own motion may request a hearing in another circuit
because of convenience to the parties, witnesses, or the court
or because of the [individual'o] subject's mental or physical
condition.
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 27
iiiiiiMiiiiiiniiiiioiim

Page 28
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(e) The [atfee^^^ey-gefte^ai-j—the—deptttyT-
opocial deputy,—or appointee] department of the attorney general
shall present the case for a petitioner for hearings convened
under this chapter, [except that-the attorney general,—the
attorney genora-l'o deputy,—special deputy,—or appointee need net
part-i-eipatc in or be present at-a hearing whonover] unless a
petitioner [er—seflie—ethee-appeepeiate—pereen] has retained
private counsel who will be present in court and will present to
the court the case for involuntary hospitalization.
(f) Counsel for the subject of the petition shall be
allowed adeguate time for investigation of the matters at issue
and for preparation[—] and shall be permitted to present the
evidence that the counsel believes necessary to a proper
disposition of the proceedings, including evidence as to
alternatives to inpatient hospitalization.
(g) No individual may be found to require treatment in a
psychiatric facility unless at least one [phys-i-eian,—advanced
praot-icc ■ rogiotorod nuroo, ] qualified psychiatric examiner or
psychologist who has personally examined the individual
testifies in person at the hearing. This testimony may be
waived by the subject of the petition. If the subject of the
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx

MimiiiiMHiiNum

Page 29
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
petition [has—eefesed] refuses to be examined by a [licensed
phys-ieiaftT—advanced practice re^-isto-red-nursoT-] qualified
psychiatric examiner or psychologist, the subject may be
examined by a court-appointed [licensed physician,—advanced
practice- registered nurse,] qualified psychiatric examiner or
psychologist. If the subject refuses to be examined and there
is sufficient evidence to believe that the allegations of the
petition are true, the court may make a temporary order
committing the subject to a psychiatric facility for a period of
no more than five days for the purpose of a diagnostic
examination [and evaluation]. The subject's refusal to be
examined shall be treated as a denial that the subject is
mentally ill or suffering from substance abuse. Nothing in this
section shall limit the [indarvidttai^] subject' s privilege
against self-incrimination.
(h) The subject of the petition in a hearing under this
section has the right to secure an independent [medical or
psychological -evaluation] examination and present evidence
thereon.
(i) If after hearing all relevant evidence, including the
result of any diagnostic examination ordered by the court, the
2025-2876 SB1322 GDI SMA-l.docx


Page 30 1322
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
court finds that [on individual] a subject of a petition is not
a person requiring medical, psychiatric, psychological, or other
rehabilitative treatment or supervision, the court shall order
that the [individu-al.] subject be discharged if the [ind-ividua-l]
subject has been hospitalized [prdrei^^fee] before the hearing.
(j) If the court finds that the criteria for involuntary
hospitalization under section 334-60.2(1) has been met beyond a
reasonable doubt and that the criteria under [-seetdrefts-] section
334-60.2(2) and [-3^4—60;2 (3) ] (3) have been met by clear and
convincing evidence, the court may issue an order to any law
enforcement officer to [dolivor] transport the subject of the
order to a facility that has agreed to admit the subject as an
involuntary patient, or if the subject is already a patient in a
psychiatric facility, authorize the facility to retain the
patient for treatment for a period of ninety days unless sooner
discharged. The court may also authorize the involuntary
administration of medication, where the subject has an existing
order for assisted community treatment[—] issued pursuant to
part VIII of this chapter [7—assisted—eemmuftity
treatment,] and in accordance with the treatment prescribed by
that existing order. Notice of the subject's commitment
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 30

Page 31 1322
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
and the facility name and location where the subject will be
committed shall be provided to those persons entitled to notice
pursuant to section 334-60.4. An order of commitment shall
specify which of those persons served with notice pursuant to
section 334-60.4, together with such other persons as the court
may designate, shall be entitled to receive any subsequent
notice of intent to discharge, transfer, or recommit. The court
shall forward to the Hawaii criminal justice data center all
orders of involuntary civil commitment or information from all
orders of involuntary civil commitment, as requested by the
Hawaii criminal justice data center, which in turn shall forward
the information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation, or its
successor agency, for inclusion in the National Instant Criminal
Background Check System database. The orders or information
shall also be maintained by the Hawaii criminal justice data
center for disclosure to and use by law enforcement officials
for the purpose of firearms permitting, licensing, or
registration pursuant to chapter 134. This subsection shall
apply to all involuntary civil commitments without regard to the
date of the involuntary civil commitment.
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 31

Page 32
S.B. NO.
3^2
C.D. 1
[-He)-- The court may find that the subject—ef tho potitioH
■is—aft—incapacitated or protected person,—or both,—uftder^-aftdieie
V—ed—chapter 560,—and may appoiftt a guordian or—conservator,—er
both,—f-er tho subjoct terms—and condi-tions as—the
court■ghtall dotermino.
-Ft)-] (k) Persons entitled to notice [are] pursuant to this
section shall also be entitled to be present in the courtroom
for the hearing and to receive a copy of the hearing transcript
or recording, unless the court determines that the interests of
justice require otherwise."
SECTION 10. Section 334-60.7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§334-60.7 Notice of intent to discharge. (a) When the
administrator, the administrator's deputy, or U^e attending
physician of a psychiatric facility contemplates discharge of an
involuntary patient because of expiration of the court order for
commitment or because the patient is no longer a proper subject
for commitment, as determined by the criteria for involuntary
hospitalization in section 334-60.2, the administrator, the
administrator's deputy, or the attending physician shall provide
notice of intent to discharge, or if the patient voluntarily
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx


Page 33 1322
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
agrees to further hospitalization, the administrator, the
administrator's deputy, or the attending physician shall provide
notice of the patient's admission to voluntary inpatient
treatment. The following requirements and procedures shall
apply:
(1) The notice and a certificate of service shall be filed
with the family court and served on those persons whom
the order of commitment specifies as entitled to
receive notice, by mail at the person's last known
address. [Nebiee] If the commitment resulted directly
from legal proceedings under chapter 704 or 706,
notice shall also be sent to the prosecuting attorney
of the county from which the person was originally
committed, by facsimile or electronically, for the
sole purpose of victim notification; and
(2) Any person specified as entitled to receive notice may
waive this right in writing with the psychiatric
facility [-f-
4^ If no-objection is filed withi-n f-iv-e -ealcndar days of
mailing the notice,—the a-dminiotrator-or attending
physician of the psychiatric facility ohal-l--d-isGharge
2025-2876 SB1322 GDI SMA-l.docx 3;

Page 34
S.B. NO.
CD. 1
the patient -or accept the—patient for voluntary
inpatient treatment;-
44-)- -tf—afty-^e£-&©H—&pee44ie4-as—efttit-ted—te-^^eeive-^ietiee
-fiies—a—wr44teft—efe^-eetiaftT—with—a—earta^ieate—of-
service-,—to the discharge or to the patient's
admission to voluntary- inpatient troa-tment on- the
grounds that the patient is a proper -subject for
commitment,—the family- court shall conduct a -hearing
as—seen—as—pasaihieT—prior to the termination of the
current commitment order,—to determine if the-patient
still meets the criteria for involuntary
hospitalization in section 334—60.2-;-- The pa2?son
filing the objection -shall also notify the psychiatric
facility by telephone on the date the objection is
filed;
444 If the family -court finds that the patient does not
meet the criteria for involunfeary--ha&pitali2otion in
section 334—GO-r^-;—the -court shall -iasuc an order of
discharge frem-tho commitment;—and
464 If the—family--eourt finds that- the patient docs meet
the criteria for involuntary hospitalization in
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 34
IIIUHHIlillllllIBnH

Page 35 S.B. NO.
CD. 1
ocction- 334-60.2, the court shall iosuc an ordor-
dcnying dischargo from the conunitmont-] .
(b) For civil commitments that do not result directly from
legal proceedings under [chapters] chapter 704 [end] or 706,
when the administrator, the administrator's deputy, or the
attending physician of a psychiatric facility contemplates
discharge of an involuntary patient, the administrator2 tl^
administrator's deputy, or Uie attending physician [may] shaJJ^
assess whether an assisted community treatment plan is indicated
pursuant to section 334-123 and, if so indicated, may
communicate with an aftercare provider as part of discharge
planning, as appropriate."
SECTION 11. Section 334-76, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§334-76 Discharge from custody. (a) Subject to any
special requirements of law as provided in sections 704-406,
704-411, and 706-607 or elsewhere, with respect to patients
committed on court order from a criminal proceeding, the
administrator of a psychiatric facility, the administrator's
deputy, or the attending physician, pursuant to section
334-60.7, shall:
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 35

Page 36 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(1) Send a notice of intent to discharge or notice of the
patient's admission to voluntary inpatient treatment
to those persons specified in the order of commitment
as entitled to receive notice of intent to discharge,
by mail at their last known address; and
(2) [Send] In cases where the commitment directly resulted
from legal proceedings under chapter 704 or 706, send
a notice of intent to discharge or notice of the
patient's admission to voluntary inpatient treatment
to the prosecuting attorney of the county from which
the person was originally committed, by facsimile or
electronically.
(b) The administrator the administrator's deputy^ or
the physician assuming medical responsibility for the patient
shall discharge an involuntary patient when the patient is no
longer a proper subject for commitment, as determined by the
criteria for involuntary hospitalization in section 334-60.2.
(c) Nothing in this section shall preclude a psychiatric
facility from accepting for voluntary inpatient treatment, in
accordance with the procedures in section 334-60.1, a patient
for whom the facility contemplates discharge pursuant to section
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 3
lllllllllllllillHIIIRIIIIM^

Page 37
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
334-60.7 and who voluntarily agrees to further hospitalization
after the period of commitment has expired or where the patient
is no longer a proper subject for commitment."
SECTION 12. Section 334-121, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§334-121 Criteria for assisted community treatment. [A
person] An individual may be ordered to obtain assisted
community treatment if the family court finds, based on the
professional opinion of a [psyehiat^eis-fe—ei^-advafieed-^i^-efeiee
reigistored nursc-with proocript-i-vo authority and who holds an
accrodit-od national cortificatien in an—advanced practioc
■registered nurse—psychiatric specialization,] qualified
psychiatric examiner, that:
(1) The [person] individual is mentally ill or suffering
from substance abuse;
(2) The [peraaa] individual is unlikely to live safely in
the community without available supervision, is now in
need of treatment in order to prevent a relapse or
deterioration that would predictably result in the
[pajeaea] individual becoming imminently dangerous to
self or others, and the [porson-' s] individual' s
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 37

Page 38 1322
S.B. NO.
S.D.2
H.D. 2
CD. 1
current mental status or the nature of the [peiHsen-’-e]
individual's disorder limits or negates the [poroon's]
individual's ability to make an informed decision to
voluntarily seek or comply with recommended treatment;
(3) The [pe^-S'Oft] individual has a:
(A) Mental illness that has caused that [per^en-]
individual to refuse needed and appropriate
mental health services in the community; or
(B) History of lack of adherence to treatment for
mental illness or substance abuse that resulted
in the [poroon] individual becoming dangerous to
self or others and that now would predictably
result in the [pei^eeft] individual becoming
imminently dangerous to self or others; and
(4) Considering less intrusive alternatives, assisted
community treatment is essential to prevent the danger
posed by the [persen-r] individual, is medically
appropriate, and is in the [per^sen-^] individual' s
medical interests,"
SECTION 13. Section 334-121.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 38

Page 39 S.B. NO. 3^^
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
"§334-121.5 Examination fo£ assisted community treatxnent
indication. A [liccnsod poychiatrio-fe -er advancod practicG
rcgiotorcd nuree with -pteseripfeive—authority an-d who helds aft
accredited nat-ional ocrtifioation in an advanced pract-icc
regi-s-tercd nurse -psych i-o trie specialization] qualified
psychiatric examiner associated with the [liceftscd] psychiatric
facility where a [pereeft] patient is located who was committed
to involuntary hospitalization, delivered for emergency
examination or emergency hospitalization, or voluntarily
admitted to inpatient treatment at a psychiatric facility
pursuant to part IV shall, before the [person's] patient's
discharge, examine the [person] patient to determine whether an
assisted community treatment plan is indicated pursuant to this
part. If a plan is indicated, the [psychiotri-s-t or advanced
practice rcgiotorcd nur-se] qualified psychiatric examiner shall
prepare the certificate specified by section 334-123. The
department of the attorney general shall assist with the
preparation and filing of any petition brought pursuant to
section 334-123 and with the presentation of the case at any
related court proceedings; provided that, if the petitioner is a
private provider or other private individual, the petitioner may
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 39
HiHHiMininm

Page 40 1322
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D.2
C.D. 1
decline the assistance. The psychiatric facility may notify
another mental health program for assistance with the
coordination of care in the community for the person. Nothing
in this section shall delay the appropriate discharge of a
[pe^^oft] patient from the psychiatric facility after the
examination for assisted community treatment indication has been
completed."
SECTION 14. Section 334-122, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By adding two new definitions to be appropriately
inserted and to read:
’’"Assisted community treatment provider” means a mental
health provider, which may include a qualified psychiatric
examiner or a mental health program, that is or will be
responsible, in accordance with an assisted community treatment
order, for the coordination, management, or administration of a
subject of the order's treatment.
’’Mental health program” means a hospital, psychiatric
facility, clinic, or other facility providing mental health
treatment to individuals suffering from mental illness or
substance abuse.”
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 40

Page 41
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
2. By amending the definition of "assisted community
treatment" to read:
""Assisted community treatment" includes medication
specifically authorized by court order; individual or group
therapy; day or partial day programming activities; services and
training, including educational and vocational activities;
supervision of living arrangements; and any other services
prescribed to either alleviate the subject of the
order's disorder or disability, maintain or maximize
semi-independent functioning, or prevent further deterioration
that may reasonably be predicted to result in the need for
hospitalization or more intensive or restrictive levels of care
in the community or incarceration for criminal behavior."
3. By amending the definitions of "subject of the order"
and "subject of the petition" to read:
""Subject of the order" means [a person] an individual who
has been ordered by the court to obtain assisted community
treatment.
"Subject of the petition" means the [per&eft] individual
who, under a petition filed under section 334-123, is alleged to
meet the criteria for assisted community treatment."
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 41

Page 42 S.B. NO.
V
3^2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
4. By deleting the definition of "advanced practice
registered nurse".
[""Advanced-practice rcgistcrod nurac" incaflG a rog-i-otored
ftarso l-ieonocd to practice in th-io St-ete who:
- {dr-}- Hao tnefe the -qualificat-iono oct forth in chapter 457
and th-ig part-t
- {-3-}- Beed«&e—ef—advaneed—eduee^fedren—and—speeiadrirsed—eiiftieai
traini-ag,—is ■ authorized to aoscoo,—se-rccn>—diagaaae-r
ordor,—utilize,—or perform medical,—t-hcrapeu^ic,
preventive,—aa—earaeafeive—measure o
- {-3-}- Holds- an accredited national certification i-a an
advanced practice registered nurse psychiatric
specialization-;—aad
Holds proscriptivo au-fehority pursuant-to sect-ion 457-

5. By deleting the definition of "treating psychiatrist".
[ "-'^-rcating-psychiatrist" means the psychiatrist who is
responsible for the management and supervision ef a person's
treatmeat—aader^-erder—ef—the—eeart-;-" ]
SECTION 15. Section 334-123, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsections (c) and (d) to read as follows:
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 42
IMIIMIIIIIIHlim

Page 43 S.B. NO.
sb'2
C.D. 1
"(c) The petition may be accompanied by a certificate of a
[liccnood■psychiatrist or advanced practico rogiatorod nuroo
with proscriptive authority and who holds an--a-ccredit-ed- nafeioftal:
certificcbtion in an advanced practioe rogistorod nurso
psychiatric specialization] qualified psychiatric examiner who
has examined the subject of the petition in person within twenty
calendar days before the filing of the petition. For purposes
of the petition, an examination shall be considered valid so
long as the [licensed-psychiatrist or advanced practico
rogistored nurse with prescriptive authority and who -he-lds an
eeeredited-^iatiefta-1—eert-if-ieatdeft—io—en—advanced—pmefeiee
rogistored nurse -psychiatric specialization] qualified
psychiatric examiner has obtained enough information from the
subject of the petition and has had face-to-face contact to
reach a diagnosis of the subject of the petition, and to express
a professional opinion concerning the same, even if the subject
of the petition is not fully cooperative. If the petitioner
believes that further [evaluation] examination is necessary
before treatment, the petitioner may request further
[eval-uation. ] examination.
2025-2876 SB1322 GDI SMA-l.docx

■IIIIIIIIHIHIIBIIlim

Page 44 S.B. NO.
3^2
h.D. 2
C.D. 1
(d) The petition shall include the name of a proposed
assisted community treatment provider and the name, address, and
telephone number of at least one of the following persons in the
following order of priority: the subject of the petition's
spouse or reciprocal beneficiary, legal parents, adult children,
[aftd] surrogate, or legal guardian [7—if one ha-s-becn appointed] .
If the subject of the petition has no living spouse or
reciprocal beneficiary, legal parent, adult [ehiidi^fi-r] child,
surrogate, or legal guardian, or if none can be found, the
petition shall include the name, address, and telephone number
of at least one of the subject's closest adult relatives, if any
can be found."
SECTION 16. Section 334-124, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§334-124 Hearing date. The family court shall set a
hearing date on a petition, and any subsequent hearing dates for
the petition, as soon as possible[—] but no later than ten days
after the filing of the petition. A hearing on the petition may
be continued pending further examination of the subject of the
petition, for the appointment of a guardian ad litem, or for
good cause."
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 4^
IMHIIIIIIIIIIIM

Page 45 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 17. Section 334-125, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending subsection (a) to read:
"(a) Notice of the hearing under this part shall be:
(1) Served personally on the subject of the petition
pursuant to family court rules;
(2) Served personally or by certified or registered mail,
return receipt requested, deliverable to the addressee
only, to as many as are known to the petitioner of the
subject's spouse or reciprocal beneficiary, legal
[pai^^¥fee-r] parent, adult [children, ] child, surrogate,
and legal guardian[7—if one-has been appointed]. If
the subject of the petition has no living spouse or
reciprocal beneficiary, legal parent, adult
[•ehiidseR-r] child, surrogate, or legal guardian, or if
none can be found, notice of the hearing shall be
served on at least one of the subject's closest adult
relatives, if any can be found;
(3) Served on the guardian ad litem appointed for the
subject of the petition [or ■the subject's OKisting
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 45
liiiiiiiiniMiiHniiiiiiiH^^

Page 46 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
guardian-,—the—detenaiftee-^fehe—estieteftee—e^-
one;] as provided in section 334-123.5;
(4) Served on the attorney for the subject of the
petition, if applicable; [eed]
(5) Served on the assisted community treatment provider
proposed in the petition, unless the petitioner is
also the proposed assisted community treatment
provider; and
(6) Given to other persons as the court may
designate."
2. By amending subsection (c) to read:
"(c) Notice [of all subse-quent-hcaringo ahahl be oervcd in
aeeef^daftee—with—sefeoeet-iefts—(-a-)—afid——and i-n- aGoordancc with
all applicable family court rules relating to service of notice/
iftdruding—that—serviee—need—net—be-^ftade—en-^a^^fe-iee—in—deia^iih
for failure to appear.] to the subject of the petition's spouse
or reciprocal beneficiary, legal parent, adult child, or closest
adult relative may be waived if the subject is an adult and
requests that these persons not be notified."
SECTION 18. Section 334-126, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (g) to read as follows:
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 46
miiHiiniiiuiiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 47
S.B. NO.
CD. 1
"(g) No subject of the petition shall be ordered to
receive assisted community treatment unless at least one
[poychi-Qtriot o-r advanced prac-t-i-ce registered nuroo with
proocriptivc authority and who holds an accredited national
eerti^ieat-ien—in—an—advanced—praet-iee—registered—ftttt&e
pcychiatric specialization testifies in poroon-at tho-hoaring]
qualified psychiatric examiner who has personally [assesced]
examined the subject!—] within a reasonable time before the
filing of the petition [up to the time when the psychiatrist or
advanced practice registered nuroo with proscriptive authority
and who-holds-an—aGoredited national certification in an
advane-ed -practice registered n-a-roc psychiatriG-opccialization]
provides oral testimony at [court.] the hearing. The [testifflony
of tho-psychia-t-r-ist or advanced practice regiot-ered nurse with
proscriptive authority and who holds an--accredited national
certif-i-eation in an advanced practice ■registered nuroo
psychiatric opeeialization] qualified psychiatric examiner shall
[stete] provide the facts [which] that support the allegation
that the subject meets all the criteria for assisted community
treatment, provide a written treatment plan, which shall include
non-mental health treatment if appropriate, provide the
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx


Page 48 1322
S.B. NO
S.D.2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
rationale for the recommended treatment, and identify the
[dcaignatod mental health program rooponoiblc for the
eoordination of care.] assisted community treatment provider.
If the recommended assisted community treatment includes
medication, the testimony [e#] provided by the [poychiatriot o-r
advanced" practice registered nurse with-prescig^ptivc authority
and who holds an- aecrod-irtod national cortificat-ion in an
advanced practice registered nu-roo psychiatric specialization]
qualified psychiatric examiner shall describe the types or
classes of medication [whieh] that should be authorized, and
describe the physical and mental beneficial and detrimental
effects of [such] the medication."
SECTION 19. Section 334-127, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§334-127 Disposition. (a) If2_ after [heer^ine]
considering all relevant evidence, including the results of any
diagnostic examination ordered by the family court, the family
court finds that the subject of the petition does not meet the
criteria for assisted community treatment, the family court
shall dismiss the petition. Notice of the dismissal shall be
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx

niiHiiiMiMHiiinnBiii

Page 49
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
provided to those persons entitled to notice pursuant to section
334-125.
(b) after hearing all relevant evidence, including the
results of any diagnostic examination ordered by the family
court, the family court finds that the criteria for assisted
community treatment under section 334-121(1) have been met
beyond a reasonable doubt and that the criteria under section
334-121(2) to (4) have been met by clear and convincing
evidence, the family court shall order the subject to obtain
assisted community treatment for a period of no more than two
years. The written treatment plan submitted pursuant to
section 334-126 (g) shall be attached to the order and made a
part of the order.
If the family court finds by clear and convincing evidence
that the beneficial mental and physical effects of recommended
medication outweigh the detrimental mental and physical effects,
if any, the order may authorize types or classes of medication
to be included in treatment at the discretion of the [t-reati-ng-
ps-ychi-otriot or advanced practice registered nurse with
pr-escriptivc authority ■■and who -holds an accredited national
eertification in an advanced practice-r-egistcred nurse
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 49
IhirilllilllHHIIIlUiiflllhl

Page 50
S.B. NO.
CD. 1
psychiatric opoe-ialization. ] assisted community treatment
provider.
The court order shall [alree] state who should receive
notice of intent to discharge early in the event that the
[treating psychiatrist or advanced practice registered nurse
with pr-escriptive autho-r-ity and-v>fho holds an accrediteei- national
certification in-an advanced practice registered nurse
psychiatric spceialization] assisted community treatment
provider determines, before the end of the court ordered period
of treatment, that the subject should be discharged early from
assisted community treatment.
Notice of the order shall be provided to the director, the
[i-ntcres-fecd party who filed the petition, ] petitioner, and those
persons entitled to notice pursuant to section 334-125.
(c) The family court shall also designate on the order the
[treating psychiatrist or advanecd practice registered -nurse
with pre-seriptivo authority and-who holds an- aecredited- national
certification -in—an—advanced practice registered nurse
psychiatric specialization who—io to be rcspons-iblo fe-i? the
management and supervision of the subject's treatment,—er sh-a-li
assign an—admin-is-trator of—a—designated mental -health program
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx


Page 51
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
—in turn,—dooignatc the treating poychintr-i-st or advanced
practice registor-cd nurse with prescriptive authority and who
lieids—eft—nafeieaair-eei^fe-i-^-i-eat-ireft—ift—an—a-dvafteeel
p^?aet-iae—reefiafeared—naftsa-^ayediafe-Eda—apeaiai-iaat-iaft—dardftg-^fede
treatment- period without court approval,—aftd-iaay—daaa^ftata
cither apublialyemployedpsychiatristor advanced—practice
registered nurse with proscriptive authority and who holds an
accreditod nati-onal ceatificat-don in aft advaneed practice
registarod nurse psychiatric spccialiaation/—o-r- a private
payehdat-adafe—aa—advaftaad—paaatdea—aagdataaad—ftaaaa—wdtd
prescriptive authority and who holds an accreddted nat-ional
certification in an advanced practice registor-ed nurse
psychiatric specialization; provided that the private
psychiratriot or advanced practice registered nurse with
prescriptive authority and who holds a-n- accredited national
aaatdddaatdaft—dft—aft—advaftaad—paaatdea-aagdstaaad—naaaa
psychiatric specialization shall agroo--to the designation.—dha
order for assi-sted community treatment shall be subject to the
Haaddh—Gaaa—Padvaay—Haamoftdaatdoft—AatT—chapter 323B.] assisted
community treatment provider.
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 51

Page 52 S.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
(d) Nothing in this section shall preclude the subject's
stipulation to the continuance [-{•]of[+] an existing court
order."
SECTION 20. Section 334-129, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows;
"§334-129 Failure to comply with assisted community
treatment. (a) A [treating psychiotriot or advanced practice
jregiotcrod nuroe—with p-gescriptivo authority and who he-ldo an
accredited national certification in an advanced prac-t-arco
rogiotcred nurse-psychiatric ppecializa-tion] qualified
psychiatric examiner may prescribe or administer to the subject
of the order reasonable and appropriate medication or
medications, if specifically authorized by [the] a court order,
and treatment that is consistent with accepted medical standards
IS and the [femiiy] court order, including the written treatment
plan submitted pursuant to section 334-126(g)[—], in accordance
with the procedures described in subsection (b).
(b) [No subject of the order shall be-physically forced to
take medication under a family court order -fer--aGaisted
uftie&e—the—sufej-eet—irs—withifi—an—emeggeftey
department or admitted to a hospi-tal,—s-ufesegeeftt—te-^the—dahe—
2025-2876 SB1322 GDI SMA-l.docx 52

Page 53
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
■feho current aDoiDted comfiunity t-rcatment orde-r.] A qualified
psychiatric examiner may administer medication or medications
specifically authorized by a court order to a subject of the
order over objection of the subject during emergency examination
or hospitalization under part IV, subpart A or while committed
for involuntary hospitalization under part IV, subpart C.
(c) A subject of the order may be transported to [a
designated mental health progranty—or a hospit-alr- emergency
department,] a psychiatric facility or other facility designated
by the director for failure to comply with an order for assisted
community treatment via the following methods:
(1) By an interested party with the consent of the subject
of the order; or
(2) In accordance with section [-334—334-E (b) .
(d) The [designated mental health program's treating
psychiatrist or advanced-practice registered nurse with
prescriptiveauthorityand who-heldsan—accreditednational
cortificati-on in an advanced practice registered nurse
psychiatric specialization or dosignee of the-psychiatr-ist or
advanced--proetice registered—n-ar-sc wi-th—prescriptive a-u-thoriby
and whe-tiolds an accredited na-t-ional certification in- an
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 53
iiiiiisiiiiiiiiiiemiiBsiiiiia

Page 54
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
advanced pract-i-oe rcgiotGrod nurao psy-ehiatric—opocial^zatioft]
assisted conwaunity treatment provider shall make [eii]
reasonable efforts to solicit the subject's compliance with the
prescribed treatment. If the subject fails or refuses to comply
after the efforts to solicit compliance, the [t-rcating
psyehiati-Sr&t—ei—advafteed—pi^et-tee—£egist-&red—fturee—with-
prescriptive authority -and who holds an accredited national
certificationin—an—advanced practiceregisterednurse
psychiatric specialization] assisted community treatment
provider shall [assess whether the subj-ect of—the order-meets-
criteria for involuntary hospitalizati-en under part IV of thi-a
chapter,—aftd] proceed [with the admission pursuant to. section
[334-59 (a) (2)—or—(3) -;-] pursuant to section 334-D or 334-E;
provided that the refusal of treatment shall not, by itself,
constitute a basis for involuntary hospitalization.
(e) Notice of any transport or [admission] hospitalization
under this section shall be provided pursuant to
section [-^34—&9-S-&-I-] 334-H . ”
SECTION 21. Section 334-130, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 54
■iiNniiiimiiiiH

Page 55
S.B. NO.
CD. 1
"§334-130 Period of assisted community treatment. (a)
[The] Unless a farniJji;court^orders otlierwi^e j th^ assisted
community treatment order shall continue to apply to the
subject, for the duration specified in the order, regardless of
whether the treatment setting changes.
(b) A subject of [asDiotcd community troatmcnt is] the
order shall be automatically and fully discharged at the end of
the family [court orde^d] court-ordered period of treatment [—]
pursuant to an assisted community treatment order, a period of
no more than two years, unless a new family court order has been
obtained [as provided heroinbclew].
(c) Nothing in this section shall preclude the subject's
stipulation to the continuance (-f-]of[+] an existing court
order."
SECTION 22. Section 334-131, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) When the [treating psychiatrist or advancod practice
rcgiotcrod nurse with proseripfeivc authority and who ho-ldo an
aocreditod nat-ronal cortificat-ien in an advanced practreo
rogisto-red nurse psych-iatric specialization] assisted community
treatment provider contemplates discharge for a subject of the
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 55
imiiiioHiiiMiiimHiiiiii

Page 56 1322
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
order because of the imminent expiration of the court order or
because the subject of the order is no longer a proper subject
for assisted community treatment, as determined by the criteria
in section 334-121, the [treating psychiatrist or advanced
practice ■registered nurse with prcocrlptivo aut-hority and who
holds an accredited national certification in an advanced
practice -registorod nurse psychiatric specialization] assisted
community treatment provider shall provide notice of intent to
discharge."
SECTION 23. Section 334-161, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) A patient who has been committed to a psychiatric
facility for involuntary hospitalization or who is in the
custody of the director and residing in a psychiatric facility
may be ordered to receive treatment over the patient's
objection, including the taking or application of medication, if
the court, or administrative [penei] decision-maker through the
administrative authorization process established pursuant to
section 334-162, finds that:
(1) The patient suffers from a physical or mental disease,
disorder, or defect;
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx
IIIJIIflHIIIIIiliiiltltiilUilllHI

Page 57 S.B. NO. 1322
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
(2) The patient is imminently dangerous to self or others;
(3) The proposed treatment is medically appropriate; and
(4) After considering less intrusive alternatives,
treatment is necessary to forestall the danger posed by the
patient."
SECTION 24. Section 334-162, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) A patient who is in the custody of the director and
in a psychiatric facility may be ordered to receive medical
treatment over the patient's objection through an administrative
authorization process that includes the following due process
safeguards:
(1) The facility shall give notice to the patient of the
authorization process and the reasons for initiating
the process;
(2) The administrative [panel shall cons-i-et of throo
members] decision-maker, who shall be a psychiatrist
with relevant clinical training and experience, and
who [ate] is not involved with the current treatment
of the patient[v-] , shall, after considering all
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 57

Page 58
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
releyant evidence^det^rnmie whetlie£t2ie crite£^
under section 334-161 are met;
(3) The patient shall have the right to attend the
hearing, receive assistance from an advisor, cross
examine witnesses, and present testimony, exhibits,
and witnesses; and
(4) The patient shall have the right to appeal the
decision of the administrative [panei-r-]
decision-maker."
SECTION 25. Section 334E-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) Any patient in a psychiatric facility shall be
afforded rights, and any psychiatric facility shall provide the
rights to all patients; provided that when a patient is not able
to exercise the patient's rights, the patient's legal guardian
or legal representative shall have the authority to exercise the
same on behalf of the patient. The rights shall include but not
be limited to the following:
(1) Access to written rules and regulations with which the
patient is expected to comply;
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 58

Page 59 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(2) Access to the facility's grievance procedure or to the
department of health as provided in section 334-3;
(3) Freedom from reprisal;
(4) Privacy, respect, and personal dignity;
(5) A humane environment;
(6) Freedom from discriminatory treatment based on race,
color, creed, national origin, age, and sex;
(7) A written treatment plan based on the individual
patient;
(8) Participation in the planning of the patient's
treatment plan;
(9) Refusal of treatment except in emergency situations or
when a court order or an administrative order pursuant
to chapter 334, part VIII or X, has been issued;
(10) Refusal to participate in experimentation;
(11) The choice of physician if the physician chosen
agrees;
(12) A qualified, competent staff;
(13) A medical examination before initiation of
non-emergency treatment;
(14) Confidentiality of the patient's records;
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 59

Page 60 SB. NO.
C.D. 1
(15) Access to the patient's records;
(16) Knowledge of rights withheld or removed by a court or
by law;
(17) Physical exercise and recreation;
(18) Adequate diet;
(19) Knowledge of the names and titles of staff members
with whom the patient has frequent contact;
(20) The right to worlc at the facility and fair
compensation for work done; provided that work is
available and is part of the patient's treatment plan;
(21) Visitation rights, unless the patient poses a danger
to self or others; provided that where visitation is
prohibited, the legal guardian or legal representative
shall be allowed to visit the patient upon request;
(22) Uncensored communication;
(23) Notice of and reasons for an impending transfer;
(24) Freedom from seclusion or restraint, except:
(A) When necessary to prevent injury to self or
others;
(B) When part of the treatment plan; or
2025-2876 SB1322 GDI SMA-l.docx 60

Page 61 1322
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
(C) When necessary to preserve the rights of other
patients or staff;
(25) Disclosure to a court, at an involuntary civil
commitment hearing, of all treatment procedures
[whieh] that have been administered [prior fee] before
the hearing; and
(26) Receipt by the patient and the patient's guardian or
legal guardian, if the patient has one, of this
enunciation of rights at the time of admission."
SECTION 26. Section 586-5.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) If, after hearing all relevant evidence, the court
finds that the respondent has failed to show cause why the order
should not be continued and that a protective order is necessary
to prevent domestic abuse or a recurrence of abuse, the court
may order that a protective order be issued for a further fixed
reasonable period as the court deems appropriate, including, in
the case where a protective order restrains any party from
contacting, threatening, or physically abusing a minor, a fixed
reasonable period extending to a date after the minor has
reached eighteen years of age.
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 61
liHiiiiimiiim

Page 62 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
The protective order may include all orders stated in the
temporary restraining order and may provide for further relief
as the court deems necessary to prevent domestic abuse or a
recurrence of abuse, including orders establishing temporary
visitation and custody with regard to minor children of the
parties and orders to either or both parties to participate in
domestic violence intervention services. If the court finds
that the party meets the requirements under
section [334-59 (a) (2) , ] 334-D, the court may further
order that the party be taken to the nearest facility for
emergency examination and treatment."
SECTION 21. Section 334-59, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
repealed.
—Baaeafgeney—esKuainatien—and—feespirtaiieatien-;----(-a-)-
Iftitiatien of proccodingo.-- An cmorgcney admission may bo
a-s—-fei-tewe-!-
44^ 4^—a—law onfefeomont"officer has reason to believe
that a person- io imminently-dangerous to self or
others /—the offieor shall call for aosiotanee from a
mente-al—health emergency worker' dooignotod by—the
direet-er; provided that if -a--law enforcement officer
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 62

Page 63 S.B. NO. 1322
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
io unable te—roach a--me nt al health ontergcncy worker
toiephenically or hao roaoon to believe the oituatien
t©—fee—unstable-be—a—degree ■that a—delay—greater
than two minutes would result—in oor-ieuo harm to the
individual,—ot-feers,—or property,—the law enforcement
officer may act fee- gain control of tho individual—
Once the law--enforcement officer has gained control of
the individual,—the law enforcement officer shall ea-il
for assistance from a mental health omorgcncy- worker-
designated by tho director-;—pi?ovidod that tho law
onforcomont officer shall document why tho s-ituation
nocossitatod-that the law onforcomonfe-officer gain
control of t-he individual.--Upon determination by the
mental health omcrgoncy worker- that the person is
imminently dangerous to self or others,—the person
shall be transported by ambulance or other suitable
moans to a ■ iicensed-psychiafe-iri-c facility or other
facility designated by- tho director for furt-her-
cvaluation and possible emergency hospitalization.--
a crisis intervention officer—has probable eauso to
believe- that■a person io imminently-dangerous to self
2025-2876 SB1322 GDI SMA-l.docx 63

Page 64
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
or ot-horo,—the crioio-intorvefttion -officer shall call
a mental health omcrgency worker to determine if the
person shall--bo transported by ambul-anco or—ether
suitable means to a behavioral hcalt-h-crisis—center
designated by the dir-ector as detormi-nod by a mental
health emergency wor-feer.--A law enforcement o-fficer-
may also take into custody and transport to-any
facility designated by the director any person
threatening or attempting suieido.--The law
enforcement officer shall make applieation for the
examination,—observation,—and-diagnosis of the person
in cu-s-tody.--¥hc application -shall state or shall be
accompanied by a statement of the cireumstanees under
which the person was taken into custody and the
reasons therefor,—whieh shall—bo transmitted—with the
person- to a physician,—advanced practice registered
nurse,—or psychologist at thc-facility-r
As used In this paragraph,—"crislo intervention
officer” has the same—meaning-as dofi-ned in section
353C-1-;
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx


Page 65 S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
-(•34- Upon written or oral application of any liccnood
phyeieiafi-;—advanced practice registerod nur-s-a,
poychologioti—attorney,—member of the- clorgy7—health
or oocial—oorvicc pr-afcooional,—or any otatc or county
employee in the course of employment-?—a judge may
issue an ox parte order orally,—but shall reduce the
erder^^t©—writiftg-^y—the—eia&e—ef—the—next—eeart—day
■following the application-,—stating that thcr-e is
probable cause to believe the person io mentally ill
or suffering from substance abuse,—is imminently
dangerous to self or others a-nd in need of care or
treatment,—or both,—giving the fi-ndingo upon which the
concl-usion is-based-;-- The order shall direct that a
law enforcement officer or other suitable individua-1
IS take the person into custody-and deliver the person -to
a designated mental health program,—bf subjoet to an
assisted community treatment order i&s-uod pursuant to
part VIII,—or—to tho-ncarcst facility designated by
the director--for emergency ox-aminotion and treatment?
or both.-- The ex parte order shall be-made a part of
the patient' s- clinical record';-- If-the application io
2025-2876 SB1322 GDI SMA-l.docx 65
miiMiimiiMiiiM

Page 66 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
oral,—the peroon making the -applicQ-te-aron shall reduce
the application to writing and shall submit the same
by noon of the next court day to the judge who issued
the oral ex parte order.-- The written application
shall--^ executed subject to the penalties of perjury
but need not be sworn to before a notary public; or
{-34- Any licensed physician^—advanced practice registered
nurse,—physioian assi-stianfe-,—or psychologist who has
examined a person and has reason to believe the person

- {-Aj- Mentally ill or suffering from ■ substance- abuse-;-
- {B-)- Imminently dangerous to seif—others;—and
- (€4 1-n—need—ef—cere—er^^breebmeftt-r
may direct transportat-ion/—by—ambuienee—er—ebbe^
suitable means/—be—a—licensed-psychiebric faeiliby—er
other facility designated by the director—for further
ovaluat-ion and-possi-b-lc emergency hospitalieabien---A
licensed physician,—an advanced p-raebl-cc rcgistorod
nurse-/—or a-physician assistant may administer
treatment as io medically necessary,—for the person's
2025-2876 SB1322 GDI SMA-l.docx 66
iiiiriiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiisiiiifiiih

Page 67 1322
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
oafc -feranoportation.-- A licensed psyehologiot may
admini-oter treatment as io poychologi-eQlly necessary.
-- Emergency examination.-- A—pet-tent—wh©—is—dei-ived?€d-^e^
emergency examination and treatment to-a psychiatric fecility er
a bchaviorol health cri-s-is center shali^bc provided an
examination,—whi-eh shall include a screening te- determine
whether the criteria for involuntary hespitalization li-stcd in
section 334—6Q.-2- persiste,—by—a—licensed physician,—medical
resident under the suporvioion-ef a licensed physicion,—©n
advanced practice registered nunoo without unnecessary delay,-
and shall bo provided seeh treatment as-is indicated by good
medical practice. —after th© examination,—screening,—and
treatment,—the 1-iccnscd—phyoici-an, medical resident under the
supervision of a- licensed physician,—or advanced practice
registered nurse-determines that the involuntary hospitalization
criteria-- persist-,—then -a-poychia-trist or advanced practice
-registered nurse who has prescriptive authority-ond who-holds an
accredited national co rt-ifi cation in an-advanced practice
registered nurse psychiatric spncialization shall further
examine- the patient to diagnose -the presence or-absence-of a
mental illness or substance use disorder;—further asse&s the
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 67

Page 68 1322
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
■ciolc that the pa-tionfe—may be cki^gcrouo -feo sei^—or othefo,—a«d
aoocoo whether or not feh-o patient needs to bo hoopitali-zod.--
-it io determined- that hospitalization is not needed,—an
examinat-ion pursuant to section 334-121.5 shall be completed.
-(-&)-- Release from emergency examination.-- tf-;—af-te-r
examination,—the licens-ed physician,—psychiatrist,—or advanced
practice registered nurse with prescriptive authority—and who
holds—an accredi-tod national certification in—an—advanced
practice-- registered nurse psychiatric specialization dotormi-n&s
that the involuntary -hespitaliz-ation criteria sot forth in
section--334—60.2- are not-met or—do not persist and the
ex-amination pu-r-auant to section 334-1217 5, where required, has
boon completed/—the patient shnil be discharged expediently,
unless the pati-ent is under criminal charges,—in which—case the
patien-fe--shall be-returned to-t-he custody of a iaw enforcement
officer.
Emergency hospitalization.-- if- the psychiatrist or
■fd-)------------
advaneed■practiceregistered nursewith-prescriptiveauthority
and whe-holds an accredited national cortification -in--an
advanced practice registered nurse psychiatrie-specialization
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx


Page 69 1322
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
who porforma the cmorgency GXQminQtion has reason to—be-licvo
that tho patient io:
4-H- Mentally ill or suffering from oubota-ficc abu-se;
42-)- -iflfHftifteftt-lry—doftgereus—"fc-e—seif—of^-other-s-;—
fdi In need of care or treatment^—or both?
the poyehiat-rist or advanced prectioe registered nurse -with
prescriptive authority and who 4^oldo an accredi-ted national
ee^^fe-tfieef-ieft—in—aft—adveeeed-^feefeiee-^egisfeeed—mwe-se
psychiaf-ric spee-ialization shal-i direct that the patient be
hospitaiized-©ft—aft—emor-gency—basis er"—cause the patient to be
transfer-red to anothcr-psychiatric facility or other faeility
designated by-t-hc direetor for emergency hospitalization,—©r
both.—The patient shali have the right immediately upon
admission to telephone bhc patient's -guardian ©r—a—fami-ly member
including a reciprocal boncfic-iery/—or -an adult- friend—and an
attorney.--If—the—pabfeftt—deefiftes—bo—exereiee—bhaf^-rfghf-;—the
©haff—ef—the—faeiiity^-shaff—iftferfH—the—adeff—petieftf—of—the
■right to waive notificat-ion to -the family,—incl-uding a
reciprocal bonef-iciary,—and sha-fl make—reasonable efforts to
ensure that tho patient's guardian or family,—fncluding a
rociproe-al beneficiary,—is notified of the emergency admission
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 69

Page 70 S.B. NO. ^2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
but the patient's fanti-ly,—including a reciprocal beneficiary,
need not--bo notified if the patient is-an adult and roqueoto
t-hat thcr-e bo ne--notifiGation.-- The patient shall be al-lowcd to
confer w-ith an a-ttorncy in private.
-(-e-)-- Reloas-e from emergency hospitalization. at—any
ti-mo du-r-i-ng the -period—of emergency hospitalization the treating
physician determines that the patient no longcr-meets the
criteria for emergency■hospitalization -and the-examination
pursuant to section 334-121.5 has been completed,—the--physician
shall cxpcdient-ly discharge the -patient-;-- If the patient is
under criminal charges,—t-hc patient shoil bo returned to the
eastody—of—a—law—enforeement—oitieerT-- In—any—eventT—the patient
shall -be-released within forty-eight hours of the patient's
admission to a poychiat-ric facil-ity or other facility -designated
hy—the—direetor-;—unless the patient voluntarily agrees to
further hospitalization,—or a procced-ing for—eourt-ordered
evaluation or hospitalization,—or both7—io in-itiated as provided
in—section 3-34—6-0.3.--If—that—time—expires—on—a—SaturdayT-
SundayT—er—holiday,—the time for- initiation is extended to the
elose-of—the-next-court day-;—Upon initiation of the
2025-2876 SB1322 GDI SMA-l.docx


Page 71 1322
S.B. NO
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
proGcodinga,—the--facility shall—be autherizcd to detain- the
patient until farther order of the court-.”]
SECTION 28. Section 334-59.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
repealed.
["-[-§^^4——Notioo of omergency transportation,
oxaminationa, and. hoapitalizationo .--Netiee—of—an—indiv4rdna4-^
emergene-y admission,—examination,—and hespitalization under this
•efeapter^^ftay—fee—given—te—at—leant—one—©^—the—feiiewin^—pemens—in
the—following order of priority-;-- the individual's spoasc or
rcciproeal beneficiary,—legal parents,—adult children,—iogai
guardian-^—if—one—has—feeen—appointed,—e^f—if-a^ene—ean-^e—feandT-
t-he closest adult relative,—as -leng as the individual-s
-Hrh Has capacity to make health care decisions and agrees;
is—given—the—eppertanity-^te—efegaet—and—dees-Hftet-
object,—or the health care provider can reasonably
infer fromthe—circumstances basedon—thecxcrciocei
professional judgment that the individual denas- not
object;—or
-i3-i Is incapacitated or -an- emergency circumstance- exists
and the health care provider determines based on the
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 71
HMIIMHilWilMmilBI

Page 72 S.B. NO. 2^2
C.D. 1
cxcr-ei-sc of profoosionQl judgment that doing so io in
the best intoroot of---fe-hc individual ]
SECTION 29. This Act does not affect rights and duties
that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that
were begun before its effective date.
SECTION 30. If any provision of this Act or the
application thereof to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or
applications of the Act that can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions
of this Act are severable.
SECTION 31. In codifying the new sections added by
sections 2, 3, and 4 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall
substitute appropriate section numbers for the letters used in
designating the new sections in this Act.
SECTION 32. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 33. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2876 SB1322 CDl SMA-l.docx 72

S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 25th day of June ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI'I

S.B. No. 1322, S.D. 2, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 1322, SD 2, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives